Massachusetts, session 194th, S2858.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 36C of chapter 127 of the General Laws of 2022, is hereby amended by striking
out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:
(a) A correctional institution, jail or house of correction shall not: (i) prohibit, eliminate
or unreasonably limit in-person visitation of inmates; or (ii) coerce, compel or otherwise pressure
an inmate to forego or limit in-person visitation. For the purposes of this section, to unreasonably
limit in-person visitation of inmates shall include, but not be limited to, providing an eligible
inmate fewer than 2 opportunities for in-person visitation during any 7–day period.
(b) A correctional institution, jail or house of correction may use video or other types of
electronic devices for inmate communication with visitors; provided, that such communications
shall be in addition to and shall not replace in-person visitation, as prescribed in this section.
(c) The Commissioner of Correction and administrators of state prisons and county
correctional facilities shall allow up to 20 individuals to be eligible to visit an incarcerated
person.
of 2

(d) The Commissioner of Correction and administrators of state prisons and county
correctional facilities shall permit individuals to visit more than one incarcerated person in
correctional custody, including in the same facility, unless there is an individual determination
that such visitation would pose a threat to security or orderly running of the facility. The
incarcerated person and the visitor shall be provided with a written explanation of the basis for
any such determination, including the objective reasoning and all evidence that was relied upon
for the determination. Any such determination may be challenged by an action under Mass.
General Laws chapter 249 section 4.
e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the temporary suspension of visitation privileges
for good cause including, but not limited to, misbehavior or during a bonafide emergency.
of 2